Massachusetts, session 194th, H3731.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 18 of chapter 81 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “or for injury sustained upon the
sidewalk of a state highway”
SECTION 2. Said Section 18 of chapter 81, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
shall be further amended by striking out the words “four thousand dollars” and inserting in place
there of the following words:- “one hundred thousand dollars”
SECTION 3. Section 15 of chapter 84, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the words “five thousand dollars” and inserting in place there of
the following words:- “one hundred thousand dollars”
SECTION 4. Section 18 of said chapter 84, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the words “within thirty days thereafter” and inserting in place
there of the following words:- “within two years thereafter”
of 2

SECTION 5. Section 19 of said chapter 84, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the words “If the person injured dies within the time required
for giving the notice, his executor or administrator may give such notice within thirty days after
his appointment. If by reason of physical or mental incapacity it is impossible for the person
injured to give the notice within the time required, he may give it within thirty days after such
incapacity has been removed, and if he dies within said thirty days his executor or administrator
may give the notice within thirty days after his appointment.” and inserting in place there of the
following words:- “If the person injured dies within the time required for giving the notice, his
executor or administrator may give such notice within two years after his appointment. If by
reason of physical or mental incapacity it is impossible for the person injured to give the notice
within the time required, he may give it within two years after such incapacity has been removed,
and if he dies within said two years his executor or administrator may give the notice within two
years after his appointment.”
SECTION 6. Section 36 of chapter 92, as so appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the words “or for injury sustained upon the sidewalk of a
boulevard”
of 2